Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 7 Operation of Railroads Generally

39-7-1.
Minimum clearance on bridges erected over tracks.

No bridges, viaducts, or other obstructions shall be constructed, insofar as practicable, over tracks in a railroad yard over which switching movements will be made at not less than twenty-three feet (23´) in the clear, and over any other railroad tracks at not less than twenty-two feet, six inches (22’6"), measuring from the bottom of the lowest timber to the top of the rail on the tracks. An exemption may be granted from any and all requirements of this section; provided, however, that any exemption must be limited to the specific bridge, viaduct, or other obstructions upon agreement between the department of transportation, public utilities administrator, railroad company, and the designated labor representative representing the railroad employees whose duties are to be atop of cars while in motion; provided, further, the agreement shall fix and prescribe reasonable regulations governing the location exempted; and provided, further, that an agreement between the aforesaid parties must be consummated within fifteen (15) days from the date of the request for an exemption from any and all requirements of this section. In case of failure to consummate an agreement, the public utilities administrator shall issue an order on the request for an exemption. The public utilities administrator shall, when issuing an order, take into consideration that his or her paramount responsibility in his or her decision to issue the exemption must be the safety of the railroad employees whose duties are to be atop of cars while in motion.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 24; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 28; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

39-7-1

; P.L. 1961, ch. 63, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 199, § 5.

39-7-2.
Blocking of frogs, switches, and guardrails.

Every railroad corporation, operating a railroad or part of a railroad in this state, shall adjust, fill, or block the frogs, switches, and guardrails on its track, with the exception of guardrails on bridges, so as to prevent the feet of its employees from being caught therein. The work shall be done to the satisfaction of the division of public utilities and carriers, evidenced by its certificate. Any railroad corporation failing to comply with the provisions of this section shall be fined an amount not less than one hundred dollars ($100) but not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 50; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 54; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 45; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 45; G.L. 1956, §

39-7-2

.

39-7-3.
Brakes on passenger cars.

Every railroad corporation whose cars are propelled by steam shall cause a power brake to be attached to every passenger car used for conveyance of passengers, which brake shall be so arranged that it may be put in operation by the engineer when the train is in motion. Every railroad corporation that shall use any passenger car for the conveyance of passengers, without the power brake so applied, shall for every offense be fined one hundred dollars ($100), one-half (1/2) thereof to the use of the complainant and one-half (1/2) thereof to the use of the state; but this penalty shall not apply to an incidental conveyance of passengers in freight cars, nor to “dummy cars,” so-called, nor to a passenger car attached to the rear end of a freight train or dummy engine.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, §§ 22, 23; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, §§ 26, 27; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, §§ 17, 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, §§ 17, 18; G.L. 1956, §

39-7-3

.

39-7-4.
Passenger cars not to be followed by cars loaded with dirt or stone.

No car or carriage for the transportation of passengers over any railroad shall be propelled on the railroad when placed between the locomotive and cars loaded with dirt or stone. Every railroad corporation upon whose railroad shall be propelled cars or carriages for the transportation of passengers, so placed, shall be fined five hundred dollars ($500), one-half (1/2) thereof to the use of the complainant and one-half (1/2) thereof to the use of the state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, §§ 20, 21; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, §§ 24, 25; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, §§ 15, 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, §§ 15, 16; G.L. 1956, §

39-7-4

.

39-7-5.
Method of illuminating passenger cars — Fire equipment.

No passenger car on any railroad shall be lighted by naphtha or by any illuminating oil or fluid made in part of naphtha, or wholly or in part from coal or petroleum, or other substance or material which will ignite at a temperature of less than three hundred degrees (300 degrees) fahrenheit. Every railroad corporation shall provide and keep in every car used by it for the transportation of passengers one pail, one axe, and one iron bar, which shall at all times be kept in order for use. Every railroad corporation violating the provisions of this section shall be fined one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense, one-half (1/2) thereof to the use of the complainant, and one-half (1/2) thereof to the use of the state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 26; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 30; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

39-7-5

.

39-7-6.
Heating of cars.

No passenger, mail, or baggage car, on any railroad in this state, shall be heated by any method of heating by furnace or heater, unless the furnace or heater shall first have been approved in writing by the division of public utilities and carriers; provided, however, that in no event shall a common stove be allowed in a car. Every railroad corporation that shall use any car in violation of the provisions of this section shall be fined one hundred dollars ($100) for every day on which the car shall be used, one-half (1/2) thereof to the use of the complainant, and one-half (1/2) thereof to the use of the state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 27; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 31; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

39-7-6

.

39-7-7.
Water in passenger cars.

Every railroad corporation shall carry on each passenger car operated by steam a sufficient quantity of good water, with suitable vessels for using the water, and every railroad corporation refusing or neglecting to comply with the requirements of this section shall be fined twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 25; P.L. 1902, ch. 993, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 29; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

39-7-7

.

39-7-8.
Ejection of disorderly or nonpaying passengers.

If any person behaves in a disorderly manner, or refuses to pay the regular fare, or rides upon the platform of a car after having been told by the conductor or trainperson to go inside the car, the train may be stopped and he or she may be ejected at any regular station on the road; and every person ejecting a passenger under the provisions of this section at any other place than at a regular station shall be fined one hundred dollars ($100).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 43; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 47; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 38; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 38; G.L. 1956, §

39-7-8

.

39-7-9.
Approach of railroad junctions or drawbridges.

Every person driving a locomotive, when approaching any crossing or junction of any two (2) railroads where the rails of one cross or connect with the rails of the other at grade, or when approaching any drawbridge now in use as such, shall stop the locomotive at some point within the distance of five hundred feet (500´) from the crossing, junction, or drawbridge, and before reaching the same, and shall not drive the locomotive over the crossing, junction, or drawbridge, at a greater rate of speed than six miles per hour (6 m.p.h.); provided, however, that the division of public utilities and carriers may grant to any railroad corporation the privilege of crossing the junction or drawbridge without stopping, whenever it determines the same can be done consistently with the public safety.

Every person violating the provisions of this section shall be fined one hundred dollars ($100); and the railroad corporation in whose employment, or upon whose railroad, the person shall be at the time of committing such offense, shall be fined three hundred dollars ($300).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, §§ 14, 15; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, §§ 17, 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, §§ 8, 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, §§ 8, 9; G.L. 1956, §

39-7-9

.

39-7-10.
Whistles in vicinity of Hamlet station.

The Providence and Worcester railroad company and its lessees, the New York, New Haven and Hartford railroad company, are hereby forbidden to blow or cause to be blown or permit any of its employees to blow any locomotive signal whistles along its tracks, between the Hamlet Station and the crossing over the Blackstone River next northerly thereof, except in cases of emergency and apparent danger to life and property.

History of Section.

P.L. 1896, ch. 432, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

39-7-10

.

39-7-11.
Maintenance of margins on yard tracks.

In order to provide railroad employees a reasonably safe place to work, it shall be the duty of all persons, firms, or corporations engaged in the operation of railroads in this state to keep and maintain those margins alongside their yard tracks, except designated clean out and repair tracks, where the railroad employees are required to walk frequently in the course of their duties, reasonably free from debris and vegetation that unreasonably affects the safety of the employees while working. This section shall be enforced by the public utilities administrator upon complaint and after due hearing.

Any violation of the provisions of this section shall be deemed a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) but not more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each separate offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 195, § 1.

39-7-12.
Catwalks and handrails on bridges.

Every railroad corporation or railroad company operating a railroad within this state shall on and after September 1, 1993, maintain and construct a handrail and catwalk on each railroad bridge and/or trestle that is constructed or renovated for use by the railroad. The handrail and catwalk shall extend the full length of the bridge or trestle. Every railroad that shall violate the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). Each violation of this section shall be a separate offense. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a violation of this section shall be classified as a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 450, § 1.